02_Morphology/chv/chv.twol
Alphabet
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ 
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е 
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0 
 %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0
 %{ъ%}
;



Sets 

BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю %{ъ%} ;

FrontVow = ӗ э и ӳ е ; 

Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ ; 

Vls = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ӗ э и ӳ е ;

ArchiCns = %{м%};

Rules

! a:b   CONSTRAINT_OPERATOR   LEFT_CONTEXT   _   RIGHT_CONTEXT ;

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _;

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:а <=> BackVow: [ Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ; 

"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %>: ]+ _ ;
        except
        	%{м%}: %>:  _ н ;
		:Vls %>: _ ;

"Delete archiphoneme {Ă} between {м} and н"		
%{Ă%}:0 <=> %{м%}: %>:  _ :н ;

"Delete archiphoneme {м} before н"
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: :н ;

"Archiphoneme {Ă} does not surface following stem vowel"
%{Ă%}:0 <=> :Vls %>: _ ;

"Remove {ъ} from surface"
%{ъ%}:0 <=> _ ;
